en: Electronics Cleaners
xx: Electronics Cleaners
cs: Čisticí prostředky na elektroniku
da: Elektronisk rens
de: Elektronikreiniger
es: Limpiadores de dispositivos electrónicos
fr: Nettoyants pour appareils électroniques
it: Pulizia dispositivi elettronici
ja: 電気製品用クリーナー
nl: Reinigingsmiddelen voor elektronica
no: Elektronikkrens
pl: Środki do czyszczenia urządzeń elektronicznych
pt: Limpadores de aparelhos eletrônicos
ru: Чистящие средства для электроники
sv: Elektronikrengöring
tr: Elektronik Eşya Temizleyicileri

en: Electronics Films & Shields
xx: Electronics Films & Shields
cs: Fólie a kryty na elektroniku
da: Elektronik – film og afskærmning
de: Elektronik-Folien & -Überzüge
es: Láminas y películas para dispositivos electrónicos
fr: Films de protection
it: Pellicole e schermi per dispositivi elettronici
ja: 電気製品用フィルム・カバー
nl: Folie en schermen voor elektronica
no: Elektronikkfilm og -deksler
pl: Folie i osłonki na sprzęt elektroniczny
pt: Protetores e filmes para eletrônicos
ru: Защитные пленки и экраны для электроприборов
sv: Film och skydd för elektronik
tr: Elektronik Eşya Film ve Koruyucuları

en: Electronics Stickers & Decals
xx: Electronics Stickers & Decals
cs: Samolepky a obtisky na elektroniku
da: Elektronik – klistermærker og overføringsetiketter
de: Elektronik-Sticker & -Aufkleber
es: Pegatinas para dispositivos electrónicos
fr: Autocollants pour appareils électroniques
it: Adesivi e decalcomanie per dispositivi elettronici
ja: 電気製品用シール・ステッカー
nl: Stickers en plakplaatjes voor elektronica
no: Elektronikk-klistremerker og -dekorasjoner
pl: Naklejki i kalkomanie na sprzęt elektroniczny
pt: Adesivos e decalques para eletrônicos
ru: Наклейки и переводные картинки для электроприборов
sv: Klistermärken och dekaler för elektronik
tr: Elektronik Eşya Yapıştırma ve Çıkartmaları

en: Keyboard Protectors
xx: Keyboard Protectors
cs: Ochranné kryty na klávesnici
da: Tastaturbeskyttelse
de: Tastaturschutz
es: Protectores para teclados
fr: Protections pour clavier
it: Protezioni tastiera
ja: PCキーボードカバー
nl: Toetsenbordbeschermers
no: Tastaturbeskyttere
pl: Nakładki na klawiaturę
pt: Protetores para teclado
ru: Протекторы для клавиатур
sv: Tangentbordsskydd
tr: Klavye Koruyucular

en: Privacy Filters
xx: Privacy Filters
cs: Privátní filtry
da: Skærmfiltre
de: Blickschutzfilter
es: Filtros de privacidad
fr: Filtres de confidentialité
it: Filtri privacy
ja: プライバシーフィルター
nl: Privacyschermen
no: Skjermfiltre
pl: Filtry prywatności
pt: Filtros de privacidade
ru: Фильтры конфиденциальности
sv: Sekretessfilter
tr: Gizlilik Filtreleri

en: Screen Protectors
xx: Screen Protectors
cs: Chrániče obrazovky
da: Skærmbeskyttelse
de: Display-Schutzfolien
es: Protectores de pantalla
fr: Films de protection d'écran
it: Protezioni per schermo
ja: 画面保護シート
nl: Screenprotectors
no: Skjermbeskyttere
pl: Osłony na ekran
pt: Protetores de tela
ru: Защитные плёнки для экранов
sv: Skärmskydd
tr: Ekran Koruyucular

en: Memory
xx: Memory
cs: Paměti
da: Hukommelse
de: Speicher
es: Memorias
fr: Mémoire
it: Memoria
ja: メモリ
nl: Geheugen
no: Minne
pl: Nośniki pamięci
pt: Memória
ru: Память
sv: Minne
tr: Bellek

en: Cache Memory
xx: Cache Memory
cs: Mezipaměť
da: Cachehukommelse
de: Cache-Speicher
es: Memoria caché
fr: Mémoire cache
it: Memoria cache
ja: キャッシュメモリ
nl: Cachegeheugen
no: Bufferminne
pl: Pamięć podręczna
pt: Memória cache
ru: Кэш-память
sv: Cacheminne
tr: Ön Bellek

en: Flash Memory
xx: Flash Memory
cs: Paměť Flash
da: Flashhukommelse
de: Flash-Speicher
es: Memoria flash
fr: Mémoire flash
it: Memoria flash
ja: フラッシュメモリ
nl: Flash-geheugen
no: Flash-minne
pl: Pamięci flash
pt: Memória flash
ru: Флеш-память
sv: Flashminne
tr: Flash Bellek

en: Flash Memory Cards
xx: Flash Memory Cards
cs: Paměťové karty Flash
da: Flashhukommelseskort
de: Flash-Speicherkarten
es: Tarjetas de memoria flash
fr: Cartes mémoire flash
it: Schede di memoria flash
ja: フラッシュメモリカード
nl: Flash-geheugenkaarten
no: Flash-minnekort
pl: Karty pamięci flash
pt: Cartões de memória flash
ru: Карты флеш-памяти
sv: Flashminneskort
tr: Flash Bellek Kartları

en: RAM
xx: RAM
cs: RAM
da: RAM
de: RAM
es: Memoria RAM
fr: RAM
it: RAM
ja: RAM
nl: RAM
no: RAM
pl: RAM
pt: RAM
ru: ОЗУ
sv: RAM-minne
tr: RAM

en: ROM
xx: ROM
cs: ROM
da: ROM (Read Only Memory)
de: ROM
es: Memoria de solo lectura
fr: ROM
it: ROM
ja: ROM
nl: ROM
no: ROM-minne
pl: ROM
pt: ROM
ru: ПЗУ
sv: ROM-minne
tr: Salt Okunur Bellekler

en: Video Memory
xx: Video Memory
cs: Grafická paměť
da: Videohukommelse
de: Videospeicher
es: Memoria de vídeo
fr: Mémoire vidéo
it: Memoria video
ja: ビデオメモリ
nl: Videogeheugen
no: Grafikkminne
pl: Pamięć wideo
pt: Memória de vídeo
ru: Видеопамять
sv: Grafikminne
tr: Video Belleği

en: Memory Accessories
xx: Memory Accessories
cs: Paměti – příslušenství
da: Hukommelse – tilbehør
de: Speicherkartenzubehör
es: Accesorios para memorias
fr: Accessoires mémoire
it: Accessori per memoria
ja: メモリ関連用品
nl: Geheugenaccessoires
no: Minnetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do nośników pamięci
pt: Acessórios para memória
ru: Принадлежности для модулей памяти
sv: Minnestillbehör
tr: Bellek Kartı Aksesuarları

en: Memory Cases
xx: Memory Cases
cs: Pouzdra na paměti
da: Hukommelse – æsker
de: Speicherkartenetuis
es: Fundas tarjetas memoria
fr: Étuis pour cartes mémoire
it: Custodie memoria
ja: メモリケース
nl: Geheugenbehuizingen
no: Minnekortetuier
pl: Futerały na nośniki pamięci
pt: Gabinetes de memória
ru: Кассеты для модулей памяти
sv: Minnesfodral
tr: Bellek Kartı Kutuları

en: Mobile Phone & Tablet Tripods & Monopods
xx: Mobile Phone & Tablet Tripods & Monopods
cs: Tripody a monopody na mobilní telefony a tablety
da: Stativer til mobiltelefoner og tablets
de: Drei- und Einbeinstative für Mobiltelefone und Tablets
es: Trípodes y soportes de pie sencillo para teléfonos móviles y tablets
fr: Pieds et trépieds pour téléphones mobiles et tablettes
it: Treppiedi e monopiedi per telefoni cellulari e tablet
ja: スマートフォン・タブレット用三脚・一脚
nl: Tripods en monopods voor mobiele telefoons en tablets
no: Stativer til mobiltelefoner og nettbrett – monopod og tripod
pl: Statywy do telefonów komórkowych i tabletów
pt: Tripés e monopés para celulares e tablets
ru: Треноги и моноподы для мобильных телефонов и планшетных ПК
sv: Tripoder och monopoder för mobiltelefoner och surfplattor
tr: Cep Telefonu ve Tablet Tripodları ve Monopodları

en: Power
xx: Power
cs: Napájení
da: Strøm
de: Stromversorgung
es: Electricidad
fr: Alimentation
it: Alimentatori
ja: 電源
nl: Voeding
no: Strøm
pl: Zasilanie
pt: Energia
ru: Электропитание
sv: Ström
tr: Güç

en: Batteries
xx: Batteries
cs: Baterie
da: Batterier
de: Akkus & Batterien, Batterien
es: Pilas y baterías, Pilas, Baterías
fr: Piles, Batteries, Accumulateur, Batteries & piles portables, Batteries et piles portables
it: Pile
ja: バッテリー
nl: Accu's en batterijen
no: Batterier
pl: Akumulatory
pt: Baterias
ru: Аккумуляторы
sv: Batterier
tr: Bataryalar

en: Camera Batteries
xx: Camera Batteries
cs: Baterie do fotoaparátů
da: Kamera – batterier
de: Kameraakkus & -batterien
es: Baterías para cámaras
fr: Batteries pour caméras
it: Pile per fotocamera
ja: カメラ用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor camera's
no: Kamerabatterier
pl: Akumulatory do aparatów
pt: Baterias para câmera
ru: Аккумуляторы для фотоаппаратов
sv: Kamerabatterier
tr: Fotoğraf Makinesi Bataryaları

en: Cordless Phone Batteries
xx: Cordless Phone Batteries
cs: Baterie do bezdrátových telefonů
da: Trådløs telefon – batterier
de: Akkus & Batterien für schnurlose Telefone
es: Baterías para teléfonos inalámbricos
fr: Batteries pour téléphones sans fil
it: Batterie per cordless
ja: コードレス電話用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor draadloze telefoons
no: Batterier til trådløse telefoner
pl: Akumulatory do telefonów bezprzewodowych
pt: Baterias de telefone sem fio
ru: Аккумуляторы для беспроводных телефонов
sv: Batterier till trådlösa telefoner
tr: Kablosuz Telefon Bataryaları